District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.51

Establishment of the Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund Advisory Committee.

There is established an Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund Advisory Committee (“Advisory Committee”) to advise the Office of the Chief Financial Officer in its administration of the Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund (“Fund”) established pursuant to § 1-621.09(c).

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2151
as added Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-151, § 2(d), 61 DCR 8893